Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,127
Risk-loss trust; applicability of provisions; Attorney General; State Claims Board; duties.

Whenever any claim or suit against the University of Nebraska or any of its officers, agents, or employees is covered by a risk-loss trust established pursuant to section 85-1,126, the provisions of such trust on defense and settlement of claims and suits covered by the trust shall be applicable notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of the State Tort Claims Act. The Attorney General and State Claims Board shall cooperate with the university in administering the defense and settlement provisions of any such trust.

Laws 1990, LB 542, § 2.

State Tort Claims Act, see section 81-8,235.